Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1519
Capital construction project; bids; board; adopt plans and specifications.

Each board shall adopt plans and specifications in advance of letting bids for any capital construction project. Such plans and specifications shall be the basis upon which the bids are received.

Laws 1978, LB 922, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.06;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 41.